test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-odd-nochange-litter_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - litter: # nochange
    litter+N+Sg+Nom: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Gen: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Acc: litter
    litter+N+Sg+Ill: litterân
    litter+N+Sg+Loc: litterist
    litter+N+Sg+Com: litteráin
    litter+N+Sg+Abe: litterttáá
    litter+N+Ess:    litterin
    litter+N+Par:    litterid
    litter+N+Pl+Nom: littereh
    litter+N+Pl+Gen: litterij
    litter+N+Pl+Acc: litterijd
    litter+N+Pl+Ill: litteráid
    litter+N+Pl+Loc: litterijn
    litter+N+Pl+Com: litterijguin
    litter+N+Pl+Abe: litterijttáá
    
  Noun - puttâl: # nochange
    puttâl+N+Sg+Nom: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Gen: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Acc: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Ill: puttâlân
    puttâl+N+Sg+Loc: puttâlist
    puttâl+N+Sg+Com: puttâláin
    puttâl+N+Sg+Abe: puttâlttáá
    puttâl+N+Ess:    puttâlin
    puttâl+N+Par:    puttâlid
    puttâl+N+Pl+Nom: puttâleh
    puttâl+N+Pl+Gen: puttâlij
    puttâl+N+Pl+Acc: puttâlijd
    puttâl+N+Pl+Ill: puttâláid
    puttâl+N+Pl+Loc: puttâlijn
    puttâl+N+Pl+Com: puttâlijguin
    puttâl+N+Pl+Abe: puttâlijttáá
